Maine, session 132, LD1284.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA c. 94, as amended, is repealed.
SUMMARY
This bill repeals the laws requiring providers of broadband Internet access service to
protect customer personal information from unauthorized use, disclosure or access and
prohibiting those providers from using, disclosing, selling or permitting access to customer
personal information without the express, affirmative consent of the customer.
Page 1 - 132LR1603(01)